Hawaii, session 2025, SB1241.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 237, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§237-     Exemption for medical services.  (a)  There shall be exempted from, and excluded from the measure of, the taxes imposed by this chapter all of the gross proceeds arising from the sale of medical services. (b) As used in this section, "medical services" means services provided by a person licensed under chapter 436E, 442, 447, 448, 448B, 451A, 451J, 451K, 452, 453, 453D, 455, 457, 457A, 457G, 458, 459, 461, 461J, 463E, 465, 465D, 466D, 466J, or 468E." SECTION 2.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval and shall apply to taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________